Utah statutes.
9-6-406.   Director to enter into contracts.

The director may enter into contracts on behalf of the division to acquire works of art and to commission artists for the creation of works of art as selected by the division or committees established by the division, and may sue and be sued in the name of the division upon these contracts.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

